Colorado, session 2026A, HB1205.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) The expansion of good neighbor authority through the federal
"Expanding Public Lands Outdoor Recreation Experiences (EXPLORE)
Act," Pub.L. 118-234, enhances Colorado's ability to partner with federal
agencies, local governments, and tribes to improve the health and
accessibility of Colorado's forests; and
(b) The expansion of good neighbor authority supports the state's
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

goals for wildfire risk reduction, rural economic development, sustainable
outdoor recreation, and wildlife habitat by incorporating recreation
infrastructure, cross-boundary project authority, and flexible reinvestment
of project revenue into good neighbor authority agreements.
(2) It is therefore the intent of the general assembly to modernize
references to good neighbor authority in the Colorado Revised Statutes to
reflect these federal advancements and ensure that the Colorado State Forest
Service and its partners can fully utilize the broadened federal authority to
protect and enhance Colorado's forested landscapes and communities.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-31-311, amend (2)
introductory portion and (2)(c)(II)(A) as follows:
23-31-311. Watershed protection projects and forest health
projects.
(2) The Colorado state forest service shall collaborate with water
providers; federal, state, and local governments; educational institutions;
landowners; and other interested public and private entities to recommend
the use of moneys MONEY made available pursuant to section 37-95-112.5.
C.R.S This process shall consider:
(c) (II) In identifying such watershed protection projects and forest
health projects, consideration shall be made to effectively use available
resources by:
(A) Applying the principles of the state of Colorado good neighbor
authority programs entered into between the Colorado state forest service
and the United States forest service and between the Colorado state forest
service and the United States bureau of land management DEPARTMENT OF
THE INTERIOR, UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE, OR AGENCY
OF THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF THE INTERIOR OR UNITED STATES
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE;
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-31-313, amend
(3)(e) and (6)(a)(IV) introductory portion as follows:
23-31-313. Healthy forests - vibrant communities - funds created
- outreach working group - loan program - legislative declaration -
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1205

definitions - repeal.
(3) Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise
requires:
(e) "Good neighbor authority" means the authority of the state of
Colorado pursuant to section 331 of the federal "Department of Interior and
Related Agencies Appropriation Act of 2001", Pub.L. 106-291, 114 Stat.
922, 16 U.S.C. sec. 2113a, 16 U.S.C. sec. 8571, or any analogous successor
authority.
(6) Community watershed restoration.
(a) In order to support communities and land managers in efforts to
reduce risk to people and property and increase firefighter safety, and in
support of long-term ecological restoration so that the underlying condition
of Colorado's forests supports a variety of values, including public water
supply and high-quality wildlife habitat, the forest service shall:
(IV) Conduct, or contract with one or more entities to conduct, one
or more demonstration projects that utilize Colorado's good neighbor
authority with the United States forest service to implement forest
management treatments PROJECTS that improve forest health, and resilience,
WILDLIFE HABITAT, OR OUTDOOR RECREATION OPPORTUNITIES, and supply
forest products to Colorado businesses. In overseeing a project, the forest
service shall:
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1205

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1205